Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1924.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Load Forecast Accountability Act.Section 2. Findings and declaration of policy.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., regional transmission organization (PJM) projects significant growth in electricity demand within the PJM footprint, including in this Commonwealth, driven by data centers, vehicle and building electrification and other large load additions.(2) PJM relies on load forecasts submitted by 1234567891011121314151617 Pennsylvania utilities to plan system needs and set capacity requirements that affect costs to consumers.(3) Accurate forecasting is necessary to ensure adequate supply, maintain reliability and protect consumers from costs caused by overbuilding or underbuilding resources.(4) The current process by which utilities submit information to PJM lacks transparency for policymakers, regulators and stakeholders.(5) There is a need for oversight by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission to ensure accuracy and transparency of load-forecast inputs and to coordinate with PJM and other states to avoid duplicative counting of projects and customer contracts.(b) Declaration of policy.--It is the policy of the Commonwealth to authorize and require the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission to:(1) review and validate load forecasts submitted by Pennsylvania utilities to PJM;(2) coordinate with PJM and other states so that system planning reflects accurate, nonduplicative information; and(3) obtain access to materials, including confidential agreements, that are necessary to perform this oversight.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Electric distribution company." As defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions)."LOAD FORECAST." INFORMATION USED TO ESTIMATE FUTURE PEAK 20250HB1924PN2545 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEMAND WITHIN A UTILITY SERVICE TERRITORY THAT IS PROVIDED TO AND UTILIZED BY PJM TO ESTABLISH THE RELIABILITY REQUIREMENT USED IN THE CAPACITY MARKET. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE SHORT-TERM OR DAY-AHEAD FORECASTS USED FOR MARKET OPERATIONS."PJM." PJM Interconnection, L.L.C., regional transmission organization or its successor."Utility." An electric distribution company. or other entity that serves end-use electric load within this Commonwealth and provides load-forecast information to PJM.Section 4. Commission oversight of load forecasting.(a) Investigation.--The commission shall investigate the methodologies, data and assumptions used by utilities when developing load forecasts submitted to PJM.(b) Conduct.--In conducting the investigation under subsection (a), the commission shall have the following duties:(1) Review materials, data sets and filings that utilities provide to PJM for load forecasting.(2) Evaluate the accuracy, consistency and transparency of forecasting methods and assumptions.(3) Review and audit specific large-load interconnection requests to ensure that only projects with a high likelihood of development are included in a forecast, including consideration of financial commitments made by an interconnecting customer.(4) Coordinate with PJM so that Pennsylvania forecasts are incorporated into regional planning on a fair, accurate and nonduplicative basis.(5) Collaborate with PJM and other state utility commissions within the PJM footprint to prevent double-counting of new large loads and customer contracts and to 20250HB1924PN2545 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assess whether other state practices would improve this Commonwealth's approach.(c) Outcome.--The commission may SHALL issue or promulgate orders, guidance or regulations as necessary to implement this section.Section 5. Access to confidential contracts and information.(a) Authority.--In order to perform the commission's duties under this act, the commission may review contracts, agreements and commitments between interconnecting customers and utilities that affect load-forecast assumptions.(b) Production.--Upon request by the commission, INCLUDING THE BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THE COMMISSION, THE OFFICE OF SMALL BUSINESS ADVOCATE AND THE OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE, a utility shall provide the contracts, agreements or related materials to the commission for the purposes of this act.(c) Protection.--The commission shall protect the confidentiality of information produced under this section consistent with applicable Federal or State law.(C) PROTECTION.--THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF ANY INFORMATION PRODUCED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) SHALL BE PROTECTED CONSISTENT WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR STATE LAW, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 29, 2006 (P.L.1435, NO.156), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC UTILITY CONFIDENTIAL SECURITY INFORMATION DISCLOSURE PROTECTION ACT.Section 6. Annual report.(a) Report.--No later than June 30 of each year the commission shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and 20250HB1924PN2545 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives on the implementation of this act and shall post the report on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents.--The report shall describe all of the following:(1) Actions taken by the commission to implement this act during the prior fiscal year.(2) Findings from the commission's review of utility load-forecast processes and materials submitted to PJM.(3) Coordination with PJM and other states to prevent duplicative counting of projects and customer contracts.(4) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes to improve load-forecast oversight and reliability.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1924PN2545 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516